North Carolina, session 2025, SB722.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 114 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 11.
"Online Safety Division.
"§ 114-75. Division established; duties.
(a) There is hereby established in the Office of the Attorney General of North Carolina,
the Online Safety Division (Division). The attorneys assigned to this Division shall function as
an independent regulatory office within the Department of Justice focusing on online safety, with
an emphasis on the protection of children online. The Division shall have the following duties:
(1) Investigation of complaints made under the Chapter 114B of the General
Statute (Children's Online Safety Act).
(2) Educating of law enforcement agencies and the general public about the online
safety of all North Carolinians, with an emphasis targeting harmful activities
and dark patterns.
(3) Issuance of online safety standards and guidelines, and review of relevant
industry codes pertaining to internet safety, age-appropriate design, and
compliance with the Children's Online Safety Act.
(4) Facilitating advisory panels on internet safety, including child development
experts, technology specialists, parent representatives, community
stakeholders, and industry representatives."
SECTION 1.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the Department of Justice the sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year and the sum of four million five hundred thousand dollars ($4,500,000) for the 2026-2027
fiscal year to establish the Child Safety Division as enacted by this section.
SECTION 2.(a) The General Statutes are amended to add new Chapter to read:
"Chapter 114B.
"Children's Online Safety Act.
"§ 114B-1. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
*S722-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Age-appropriate design. – Design focused on developmental needs of
children.
(2) Child or minor. – An individual under eighteen (18) years of age
(4) Covered platform. – An internet platform providing online services having
more than five million (5,000,000) users in North Carolina and revenues
exceeding twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) annually.
(5) Dark patterns. – Manipulative design elements in online environments.
(6) Division. – The Online Safety Division of the North Carolina Department of
Justice.
(7) Harmful content. – Content that includes cyberbullying, self-harm promotion,
sexually explicit material, violent content, discrimination, and other physical
or psychological harms.
(8) Online service. – Social media, gaming platforms, messaging services,
content-sharing platforms, and other user-interactive services provided by a
covered platform.
"§ 114B-2. Duty of care established; mandated protections for children; requirements for
covered platforms.
(a) It is the public policy of this State that its children are owed a duty of care with regard
to their online activities in order to limit foreseeable harm and their exposure to dark patterns and
harmful content on covered platforms. Further, the General Assembly endorses age-appropriate
design and strong parental controls as central to protecting children in online service
environments.
(b) Covered platforms shall require parental notification for accounts created by children
and must offer robust, easy-to-use parental supervision tools such as filtering options, contact
management, time limits and scheduling, purchase controls, and activity reporting.
(c) It is unlawful for covered platforms to use dark patterns or deploy features known to
be addictive or manipulative.
(d) Covered platforms shall establish clear definitions of what constitutes cyberbullying
and include provisions for direct reporting to the Division, as well as provide intervention and
support services for affected children, including mediation options where appropriate.
(e) Each covered platform shall submit to the Online Safety Division an annual Child
Impact Assessment for new an existing services on the platform. The assessment shall include
documentation of potential risks to children and assessment of addiction and compulsive usage
risks. The documentation supporting each annual assessment shall be retained for at least a
three-year period
(f) Covered platforms shall utilize the highest privacy settings by default for all users
reasonably likely to be children and shall establish strict data minimization principles to include
the following:
(1) Limiting collection of personal data to what is necessary for the service.
(2) Requiring deletion when no longer needed.
(3) Prohibiting data use for commercial purposes unless strictly necessary.
(4) Including "Right to be Forgotten" provisions empowering minors to request
deletion of their data and content.
(5) Prohibiting profiling and behavioral advertising targeting children.
(6) Requiring child-friendly privacy information and controls.
(7) Mandating transparency about personal data use.
(8) Establishing clear restrictions on geolocation data collection and use.
(9) Data broker restrictions for children's information.
"§ 114B-3. Enforcement; construction; severability.
(a) The Attorney General shall bring civil actions to enforce this Article. In any suit
instituted by the Attorney General, in which the defendant is found to have violated this Chapter
Page 2 Senate Bill 722-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
and the acts or practices which constituted the violation were, when committed, knowingly
violative of a statute, the court may, in its discretion, impose a civil penalty against the defendant
of up to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for each violation. Civil penalties may be
imposed in a new action or by motion in an earlier action, whether or not such earlier action has
been concluded. In determining the amount of the civil penalty, the court shall consider all
relevant circumstances, including, but not limited to, the extent of the harm caused by the conduct
constituting a violation, the nature and persistence of such conduct, the length of time over which
the conduct occurred, the assets, liabilities, and net worth of the defendant, and any corrective
action taken by the defendant. The clear proceeds of penalties so assessed shall be remitted to the
Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with G.S. 115C 457.2.
(b) This Article shall be liberally construed for the protection of minors and the general
public. Noting in this Article shall be construed to infringe on any rights protected by the North
Carolina or U.S. Constitutions.
(c) If any provision of this Article is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be
invalid, void, or unenforceable, in whole or in part, the decision shall not affect the validity,
enforceability, or applicability of the remaining provisions, which shall remain in full force and
effect as if the provision held invalid, void, or unenforceable had not been included."
SECTION 2.(c) Except as otherwise provided, this section becomes effective
December 1, 2025, and applies to acts or omissions occurring on or after that date.
SECTION 3.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, Article 13A of Chapter 143B of the General
Statutes is amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 143B-1209. Cyberbullying Unit established.
(a) There is established in the State Bureau of Investigation the Cyberbullying Unit (Unit)
dedicated to the protection of children online and to aid in the enforcement of Article 11 of
Chapter 114 of the General Statutes.
(b) In addition to any other duties assigned by law, the Unit shall operate a toll-free
number and website on online child safety and cyberbullying jointly with the Department of
Justice."
SECTION 3.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund
to the State Bureau of Investigation (SBI) the sum of two million dollars ($2,000,000) for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal
year to create the Cyberbullying Unit at the SBI.
SECTION 4.(a) There is hereby established the North Carolina Online Child Safety
Commission as an independent regulatory body with oversight authority on matters relating to
the safety and wellbeing of minors in digital environments. The Commission's primary mission
shall be to protect North Carolina's children from online harms through research, education,
regulation, enforcement, and ongoing adaptation to the evolving digital landscape. The
Commission shall serve as the state's foremost authority on online child safety, advancing the
digital wellbeing of minors while respecting fundamental rights. The Commission shall be guided
by the best interests of the child, the recognition that digital safety is fundamental to childhood
development, the understanding that technology must adapt to children's needs rather than the
reverse, and the principle that powerful digital platforms must be held accountable for the safety
of young users. The Commission shall consist of nine (9) members with demonstrated expertise
and commitment to child welfare, digital technology, mental health, education, or related fields
relevant to children's online safety. Members shall be appointed as follows:
(1) Three (5) members appointed by the Governor
(2) Two (1) members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate
(3) Two (1) members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives
(4) One (1) member appointed by the Attorney General
(5) One (1) member appointed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
The Commission membership shall include, at minimum:
Senate Bill 722-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) One (1) member with expertise in child development and psychology
(2) One (1) member with expertise in digital technology and data ethics
(3) One (1) member representing parents or guardians
(4) One (1) member with expertise in cybersecurity and privacy
(5) One (1) member with expertise in education
(6) One (1) member with legal expertise in child protection
(7) One (1) youth advocate between the ages of 18-25"
Commission members shall serve four-year staggered terms, with initial appointments
varying in length to ensure continuity. The Commission shall elect a Chair and Vice-Chair from
among its members, serving two-year terms. No member shall serve more than two consecutive
terms.
SECTION 4.(b) (a) The Commission with the assistance and input of the
Department of Justice may do all of the following:
(1) Issue binding regulations implementing the provisions of this act.
(2) Establish safety standards for covered platforms.
(3) Review and approve industry codes of practice.
(4) Initiate investigations into potential violations.
(5) Issue orders requiring compliance with the act.
(6) Impose penalties for violations as provided in this act.
(7) Seek injunctive relief through the courts when necessary to prevent harm to
children.
(b) The Commission shall provide expert guidance to:
(1) The Governor and General Assembly on matters relating to online child
safety.
(2) State agencies on implementation of digital safety programs.
(3) Educational institutions on digital literacy and safety curricula.
(4) Parents and caregivers on tools and strategies to protect children online.
(5) Technology platforms on best practices for age-appropriate design.
(c) Research and data collection. – The Commission shall:
(1) Conduct or commission research on emerging online risks to children.
(2) Collect and analyze data on the prevalence and impact of online harms.
(3) Monitor global developments in online safety regulation.
(4) Evaluate the effectiveness of interventions and regulations.
(5) Maintain a database of safety incidents, platform responses, and outcomes.
(d) Educational Initiatives. – The Commission shall develop and oversee:
(1) Public awareness campaigns on online child safety.
(2) Resource development for schools, parents, and children.
(3) Training programs for educators and other professionals.
(4) Digital literacy standards for K-12 education.
(e) Complaint handling. – The Commission shall:
(1) Establish accessible mechanisms for receiving complaints about online harms
to children.
(2) Create specialized response protocols for different categories of harm.
(3) Oversee platform compliance with complaint response requirements.
(4) Intervene directly in serious cases where platforms fail to act appropriately.
(5) Provide support resources for affected children and families.
(f) Coordination and collaboration. – The Commission shall:
(1) Coordinate with relevant state agencies including the Department of Justice,
Department of Health and Human Services, and Department of Public
Instruction.
Page 4 Senate Bill 722-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) Collaborate with federal authorities including the Federal Trade Commission
and Department of Justice.
(3) Engage with international counterparts to develop consistent approaches to
digital safety.
(4) Partner with academic institutions, non-profit organizations, and other
stakeholders dedicated to child safety.
SECTION 4.(c) Annual duties and reporting requirements. – Key language
elements:
(a) State of Children's Online Safety Assessment. – The Commission shall prepare and
publish an annual "State of Children's Online Safety in North Carolina" report that:
(1) Assesses current online risks facing North Carolina's children.
(2) Analyzes trends in online harms and platform responses.
(3) Evaluates platform compliance with this act and related regulations.
(4) Identifies emerging threats and technologies of concern.
(5) Measures progress in addressing previously identified issues.
(6) Provides data-driven insights on the digital experiences of children by age
group.
(b) Platform Compliance Review. – The Commission shall conduct annual compliance
reviews of covered platforms that:
(1) Evaluate implementation of required safety measures.
(2) Assess the effectiveness of age verification systems.
(3) Review Child Impact Assessments and safety documentation.
(4) Analyze complaint handling and response times.
(5) Examine algorithmic systems for compliance with safety standards.
(6) Identify best practices and areas requiring improvement.
(7) Result in public compliance ratings for each major platform.
(c) Legislative Recommendations. – The Commission shall submit annual
recommendations to the General Assembly that:
(1) Identify necessary amendments to this act based on technological
developments.
(2) Propose new legislative measures to address emerging concerns.
(3) Suggest improvements to enforcement mechanisms.
(4) Recommend funding priorities for child online safety initiatives.
(5) Identify areas where federal action or coordination is needed.
(d) Public Hearings and Testimony. – The Commission shall:
(1) Hold at least four public hearings annually across different regions of the
State.
(2) Receive testimony from children, parents, educators, platforms, and experts.
(3) Conduct specialized hearings on emerging issues of concern.
(4) Ensure diverse perspectives are represented in deliberations.
(5) Make hearing records publicly available.
(e) Industry Engagement. – The Commission shall:
(1) Convene an annual Industry Safety Summit with platform representatives.
(2) Facilitate regular working groups on specific safety challenges.
(3) Review and approve updates to industry codes of practice.
(4) Evaluate voluntary safety initiatives.
(5) Promote adoption of safety innovations across the industry.
(f) Transparency Reporting. – The Commission shall publish annual transparency reports
detailing:
(1) Enforcement actions taken and their outcomes.
(2) Complaints received and resolved.
Senate Bill 722-First Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Penalties assessed and collected.
(4) Allocation and impact of Children's Online Safety Fund expenditures.
(5) Commission activities, investigations, and initiatives.
(6) Metrics for measuring the effectiveness of the Act's implementation.
(g) Audit of Educational Programs. – The Commission shall annually audit and evaluate:
(1) Digital literacy programs in North Carolina schools.
(2) Parent education initiatives.
(3) Professional development for educators and youth workers.
(4) Public awareness campaign effectiveness.
(5) Resource allocation and accessibility across communities.
(h) Research Agenda Development. – The Commission shall:
(1) Establish annual research priorities based on identified gaps.
(2) Commission or conduct studies on priority areas.
(3) Award research grants from the Children's Online Safety Fund.
(4) Publish findings and recommendations based on research.
(5) Ensure research informs regulatory and educational approaches.
SECTION 4.(d) Operational Framework: Key Language Elements –
(a) Staffing and Structure. – The Commission shall:
(1) Be supported by a professional staff led by an Executive Director.
(2) Maintain specialized divisions for enforcement, education, research, and
policy.
(3) Employ technologists, child development experts, data analysts, and legal
specialists.
(4) Establish advisory committees on specific issue areas as needed.
(b) Funding Mechanisms. – The Commission shall:
(1) Receive an annual appropriation from the General Assembly.
(2) Administer the Children's Online Safety Fund.
(3) Allocate penalties collected to prevention, education, and enforcement
activities.
(4) Report annually on budget allocation and performance metrics.
(c) Technological Capabilities. – The Commission shall:
(1) Maintain technical testing facilities to evaluate platform compliance.
(2) Develop data analysis capabilities to identify patterns of harm.
(3) Employ experts capable of evaluating platform algorithms and safety systems.
(4) Keep pace with emerging technologies that may pose risks to children.
(d) Ethical Frameworks. – The Commission shall:
(1) Establish clear ethical guidelines for its work.
(2) Ensure privacy protection in research and investigations.
(3) Develop age-appropriate methods for involving children in policy
development.
(4) Balance safety imperatives with other rights and considerations.
(e) Accountability Mechanisms. – The Commission shall:
(1) Be subject to oversight by the General Assembly.
(2) Maintain transparent decision-making processes.
(3) Publish the basis for regulatory determinations.
(4) Establish clear metrics for measuring its own effectiveness.
(5) Undergo periodic independent evaluation."
SECTION 4.(e) Implementation timeline. Key Language Elements –
(a) Within 90 days of this act's effective date, initial appointments to the Commission
shall be made and the Commission shall convene its first meeting.
(b) Initial Responsibilities. – Within the first year of operation, the Commission shall:
Page 6 Senate Bill 722-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Hire key staff and establish organizational structure.
(2) Develop initial regulations implementing this act.
(3) Create complaint handling systems.
(4) Establish public education programs.
(5) Develop platform compliance guidelines.
(6) Submit its first annual report to the General Assembly.
(c) Phased Implementation. – The Commission shall develop a phased implementation
plan that:
(1) Prioritizes addressing the most serious harms.
(2) Accommodates different compliance timelines based on platform size.
(3) Allows for industry adjustment to new requirements.
(4) Includes benchmarks for measuring progress.
(d) Review and Adaptation. –Every three years, the Commission shall:
(1) Conduct a comprehensive review of its activities and impact.
(2) Assess changing technological landscape and emerging challenges.
(3) Revise strategic priorities and approaches as needed.
(4) Recommend statutory amendments to maintain effectiveness.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Senate Bill 722-First Edition Page 7